Delaware, session 153, SB153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1703, Chapter 17, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1703. Unit of pupils. (n) (1) The Interagency Resource Management Committee (IRMC) shall have administrative responsibility for establishing a comprehensive and coordinated early childhood system. The IRMC shall be composed of the following members (or their designee with full voting powers): a. Secretary of Education The Lieutenant Governor , who shall be the chairperson of the IRMC. b. Secretary of the Department of Health and Social Services. c. Secretary of the Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families. d. Secretary of the Department of Education. d. e. Director of the Office of Management and Budget. e. f. Controller General. f. g. The Chair of the IRMC Extended Learning Opportunities Subcommittee and the Chair of the Early the Childhood Council as nonvoting members . h. One member of House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House, as a nonvoting member. i. One member of the Senate, appointed by the President Pro Tempore, as a nonvoting member. j. The Chair of the IRMC Extended Learning Opportunities Subcommittee as a nonvoting member. (2) An affirmative vote of a majority of all voting members shall be required to take action. (3) The IRMC shall promote interagency collaboration in the delivery of early childhood services to young children and their families including young children with disabilities. The IRMC will work to support and coordinate the implementation of the recommendations of the State early childhood plan. plan that aligns strategy and resources across state agencies. Additionally, the IRMC will support and coordinate the functions and responsibilities of the Early Childhood Council (ECC). To accomplish these goals, the IRMC shall do the following: a. Allocate Advise and make recommendations on the allocation of all funds provided by the State, obtained by it, or under its control, which are designated for children eligible for services under this subsection and Chapter 30, Title 14. except for unit funding for children with disabilities as described in this title. b. Coordinate resources, federal and state and public and private, to support family-centered services for eligible children and their families, as appropriate. c. Seek to develop collaborative approaches with the institutions of higher education for children eligible for services under this subsection. Special emphasis shall be placed on the use of existing preschool educator training and child care provider training programs. d. Coordinate planning, policy, program and funding to establish a comprehensive and coordinated early childhood system. (4) The IRMC may, at its discretion, apply for and allocate grant funds. Sources of such grant funds may include, but not be limited, to the federal Childcare Block Grant, Developmental Disabilities Council, federal Child and Maternal Health Grant, federal U.S.C. Title 20, and federal Head Start, where appropriate. (5) The IRMC may create working groups in accordance with the recommendation of the members. (5) (6) The IRMC shall report to the Governor, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House on April 15 of each fiscal year. Each report shall include: a. A summary of IRMC experience in attempting to accomplish its purposes as stated above; and b. A recommendation of the IRMC whether and how to institutionalize its activities and functions. (6) (7) The Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General are hereby authorized to transfer additional funds serving this population among the budgets of the departments represented on the IRMC if there is prior agreement by the Secretary of the department, as the case may be, to which the funds were previously allocated. (7) (8) For the purpose of facilitating the continuation of services, programs receiving an allocation under the provisions of this section may receive 20% of the prior yearâs allocation at the outset of each fiscal year. These programs are required to present program proposals to the IRMC as required by the IRMC. Upon IRMC approval, adjustments to the program allocations may be made. (8) (9) The IRMC shall be staffed by the Early Development and Learning Resources Office Early Childhood Support team in the Department of Education . Such Office shall be composed of , assisted by the Office of the Lieutenant Governor, and shall include at least 2 Education Specialists and a clerical support position. Funding shall be provided by the Department of Health and Social Services and the Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families by no later than July of each fiscal year to support the operational costs associated with 1 Educational Specialist and clerical support positions. Funds allocated in this section are to be used to support the work of the Office Early Childhood Support team and to continue the interagency coordination process for Delawareâs early childhood programs.